Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 4 Application of Federal Law

53-13-40.
Construction with federal provisions.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001, et seq., but shall not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).

History.

Code 1981, §

53-13-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 1/SB 301; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 53/SB 52.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in this Code section.